Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
BOATING LAW

[§200-21] Declaration of policy. The
legislature hereby finds, determines, and declares that this part is necessary
to promote and attain:

(1) The full use and enjoyment of the waters of the
State;

(2) The safety of persons and the protection of
property as related to the use of the waters of the State;

(3) A reasonable uniformity of laws and rules
regarding the use of the waters of the State; and

(4) Conformity with, and implementation of, federal
laws and requirements. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next